North Carolina, session 2025, HB884.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-164.13B reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-164.13B. Food exempt from tax.
(a) State Exemption. – Food is exempt from the taxes imposed by this Article unless the
food is included in one of the subdivisions in this subsection. The following food items are
subject to tax:
(1) Repealed by Session Laws 2005-276, s. 33.10, effective October 1, 2005.
(2) Dietary supplements.
(3) Food sold through a vending machine.
(4) Prepared food, other than bakery items sold without eating utensils by an
artisan bakery. The term "bakery item" includes bread, rolls, buns, biscuits,
bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, danish, cakes, tortes, pies, tarts, muffins,
bars, cookies, and tortillas. An artisan bakery is a bakery that meets all of the
following requirements:
a. It derives over eighty percent (80%) of its gross receipts from bakery
items.
b. Its annual gross receipts, combined with the gross receipts of all
related persons, do not exceed one million eight hundred thousand
dollars ($1,800,000). two million four hundred thousand dollars
($2,400,000). For purposes of this subdivision, the term "related
person" means a person described in one of the relationships set forth
in section 267(b) or 707(b) of the Code.
(5) Soft drinks.
(6) Repealed by Session Laws 2003-284, s. 45.6B, effective January 1, 2004.
(7) Candy.
(b) Administration of Local Food Tax. – The Secretary must administer local sales and
use taxes imposed on food as if they were imposed under this Article. This applies to local taxes
on food imposed under Subchapter VIII of this Chapter and under Chapter 1096 of the 1967
Session Laws."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to sales made
on or after that date.
*H884-v-1*